Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.11.010

Rights, powers, and privileges.

Each city governed under this optional municipal code, whether charter or noncharter, shall be entitled "City of . . . . . ." (naming it), and by such name shall have perpetual succession; may sue and be sued in all courts and proceedings; use a corporate seal approved by its legislative body; and, by and through its legislative body, such municipality may contract and be contracted with; may purchase, lease, receive, or otherwise acquire real and personal property of every kind, and use, enjoy, hold, lease, control, convey or otherwise dispose of it for the common benefit.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.11.010.]